tsez_numbers.lexd
PATTERNS
NumeralCard
NumeralOrd

PATTERN NumeralCard
Number(1) [<num><abs>:]
Number(1):Number(2) [<num><obl>:] 


PATTERN NumeralOrd
Number Ordinalsx


LEXICON Number(2)
сис<num>:сис сида
къ'ано<num>:къ'ано къ'уна
лъ'eно<num>:лъ'eно лъ'ора
уйно<num>:уино уира
лъено<num>:лъено лъера
йилъно<num>:йилъно илъира
гlу'лlно<num>:гlу'лlно гlу'лlира 
билlено<num>:билlено билlира
очlино<num>:очlино очlира
оцlино<num>:оцlино оцlира
хъу<num>:хъу хъура
къ'анохъу<num>:къ'анохъу къ'унахъура


LEXICON Ordinalsx
<ord>:>алlиру
